Kentucky statutes. TITLE XV Roads, Waterways, And Aviation
Bridges and Tunnels

181.020.
Construction and purchase of interstate bridges and tunnels.

All counties may purchase, construct, or reconstruct bridges over or tunnels under any boundary line stream of this state, and may purchase or obtain by gift or otherwise necessary approaches and other property from the adjoining state or subdivision thereof and from any person in the adjoining state.

History.

938p-1; 2014, ch. 92, § 254, effective January 1, 2015.

181.030.
Counties may issue bonds to pay for bridges or tunnels.

Any county may issue and sell bonds for the purchase price or the cost of construction or reconstruction of such bridge or tunnel, including the necessary approach thereto and the necessary property for the construction or support of the bridge or tunnel, as now provided by law for the issuance and sale of bonds for the construction of roads, bridges and tunnels in this state.

History.

938p-2: amend. Acts 1978, ch. 384, § 51, effective June 17, 1978; 2014, ch. 92, § 255, effective January 1, 2015.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Establishment, alteration and discontinuance of county roads, KRS Ch. 178.

Issuance of bonds and control of funds, KRS Ch. 66.

181.040.
Tolls may be charged — Use of tolls to retire bonds.

In lieu of levying a tax for the retirement of such bonds any such county may, in its discretion, collect tolls for the use of the bridge or tunnel, and all tolls collected, after payment of the necessary cost of collection and maintenance, shall be paid to the county treasurer, and shall be kept in a separate fund and used solely for paying the principal and interest on the bonds.

History.

938p-3.

181.050.
Bridge or tunnel to be free when bonds are paid and to be part of primary road system.

When enough tolls have been collected, after payment of the cost of collection and maintenance, to fully retire the bonds, the bridge or tunnel shall be free of all toll charges and become a part of the primary system of state roads.

History.

938p-4.

181.060.
Bridge commission. [Repealed.]

181.070.
Temporary joint commission. [Repealed.]

181.080.
Officers of temporary joint commission. [Repealed.]

181.090.
Name and powers of temporary joint commission; employes. [Repealed.]

181.100.
Funds of temporary joint commission; deposit; disbursements. [Repealed.]

181.110.
Duties of the temporary joint commission. [Repealed.]

181.120.
Right of entry; limitation on commission’s authority to bind itself; supervision of expenditures; bids for contracts. [Repealed.]

181.130.
Purchase of property. [Repealed.]

181.140.
Condemnation of property. [Repealed.]

181.150.
Removal of obstructions. [Repealed.]

181.160.
Completion of bridges; return of unexpended funds to state commissions. [Repealed.]

181.170.
Completion of bridges; transfer of functions and property. [Repealed.]

181.180.
Permanent joint commission. [Repealed.]

181.190.
Duties of permanent joint commission. [Repealed.]

181.200.
Disposition of net earnings of bridges. [Repealed.]

181.210.
Ordinance to determine whether bridge is to be free or toll; taxation for free bridge; tolls. [Repealed.]

181.220.
Kentucky commission may act independently. [Repealed.]

181.230.
Kentucky commission may form temporary joint commission after acting independently. [Repealed.]

181.240.
Public ways to be restored to original condition. [Repealed.]

181.250.
Bond issue; ordinance submitting question to vote; vote upon. [Repealed.]

181.260.
Issuance and sale of bonds; disposition of proceeds. [Repealed.]

181.270.
Disbursements to come from sale of bonds; Kentucky commission may borrow money; expenditure to be charged to joint commission. [Repealed.]

181.280.
Interest and principal on bonds during construction of bridges. [Repealed.]

181.290.
Successive ordinances may be submitted for issuance of bonds. [Repealed.]

181.300.
Alternative bridge commission in first-class cities. [Repealed.]

181.310.
Compensation of commissioners; employes. [Repealed.]

181.320.
Duties of commission. [Repealed.]

181.330.
Right of entry; limitation on commission’s authority to bind itself; bids for contracts. [Repealed.]

181.340.
Purchase of property. [Repealed.]

181.350.
Condemnation of property. [Repealed.]

181.360.
Removal of obstructions. [Repealed.]

181.370.
Duties of the commission upon completion of bridge. [Repealed.]

181.380.
Public ways and works to be restored to original condition. [Repealed.]

181.390.
Commission may issue bridge bonds; city not to be obligated. [Repealed.]

181.400.
Commission to provide form, denomination and place of payment of bonds; exempt from taxation. [Repealed.]

181.410.
Interest on bonds; maturity; redemption before maturity. [Repealed.]

181.420.
Registration of bonds; sale; price of sale. [Repealed.]

181.430.
Disposition of proceeds; withdrawals; surplus. [Repealed.]

181.440.
Commission may purchase bonds; not to reissue bonds. [Repealed.]

181.450.
Temporary bonds. [Repealed.]

181.460.
Trustee may be selected; provisions of trust agreement. [Repealed.]

181.470.
Tolls; fixing of rates; use of proceeds. [Repealed.]

181.480.
When tolls to cease. [Repealed.]

181.490.
Effect of proceedings begun under alternative method. [Repealed.]

181.500.
Commission to be dissolved when bonds are paid; transfer of title to state; subsequent maintenance. [Repealed.]

181.510.
Contracts
to do away with tolls.

Any city may enter into contracts for the purpose of doing away with tolls on bridges wholly or partly within the city.

The person contracting with the city shall agree to:

Acquire ownership of the bridge or portion thereof, unless it has already acquired such ownership;

Operate and maintain the bridge;

Collect tolls for traffic over the bridge or portion of bridge;

Subject to the provisions of KRS

181.520

, apply the revenues of the bridge to the amortization of the cost of the bridge or portion of bridge; and

Turn over the bridge or portion of bridge to the city upon completion of the amortization.

History.

3235g-1, 3235g-2; 2014, ch. 92, § 257, effective January 1, 2015.

181.515.
Powers of KRS 181.510 to 181.550 possessed
by urban-county governments.

Having the powers
of the city of the highest class at the time of the creation of an
urban-county government, the provisions of KRS

181.510

to

181.550

are hereby
affirmed to be possessed by urban-county governments. Any reference
to a city, mayor, city legislative body, or agency of a city in KRS

181.510

to

181.550

shall
also mean an urban-county government, mayor of an urban-county government,
legislative body of an urban-county government, or agency of an urban-county
government, respectively.

History.

Enact. Acts 2014, ch. 92, § 256, effective January 1, 2015.

181.520.
Disposition of proceeds
of bridge under contract — Payment of repairs and maintenance.

Before applying the revenues of the bridge to the amortization of the cost of the bridge as provided in KRS

181.510

, the person contracting with the city may deduct the reasonable expense of operation, repair and maintenance and a reasonable return to itself, not exceeding fifteen percent (15%) of the revenues after deducting the expense.

The contract shall provide that if alterations or improvements are necessitated by law, or by order of a governmental department, or are necessitated by casualty or other necessity, and are not in the nature of ordinary repairs or maintenance, all of the revenues, after deducting the reasonable expense of operation, repair and maintenance, shall be applied to the amortization of the cost of the bridge and the cost of the alterations and improvements. All such costs shall be deemed to include reasonable interest and financing cost.

History.

3235g-2.

181.530.
Obligations of city in
regard to the bridge.

In the contract
the city may agree to transfer and assign to the person contracting
with it, any interest or right the city has in the bridge or portion,
or any interest or right of the city to acquire the bridge or portion,
and shall agree to take over the bridge when turned over to it as
provided in KRS

181.510

,
and thereafter to maintain and operate it as a free bridge until it
is taken over and maintained and operated by the state or an agency
of the state.

History.

3235g-3.

181.540.
Owners to be relieved
from obligations.

Upon the execution
of the contract, the present owners of the bridge or portion sold
shall be relieved from any duty imposed upon such owners by legislative
enactment to maintain or keep the bridge or portion open to the public.

History.

3235g-4.

181.550.
Bridge to be public property.

The bridge or
portion, so long as operated under such contract, and thereafter so
long as operated free of tolls as provided in KRS

181.530

,
shall be deemed public property used for public purposes.

History.

3235g-5.

181.560.
Bonds may
be issued for construction or purchase of interstate bridges.

In addition to
the powers granted in KRS

181.510

to

181.550

, cities
may purchase or construct and improve, operate, and maintain bridges
over navigable streams so as to connect such cities with an adjoining
state. In order to pay the cost of such acquisition or construction
and improvements, the cities may issue bridge revenue bonds as provided
in KRS

181.660

.

History.

3235g-7, 3235g-28; 2014, ch. 92, § 259, effective January 1, 2015.

181.565.
Powers of KRS 181.560 to 181.840 possessed
by urban-county governments.

Having the powers
of the city of the highest class at the time of the creation of an
urban-county government, the provisions of KRS

181.560

to

181.840

are hereby
affirmed to be possessed by urban-county governments. Any reference
to a city, mayor, city legislative body, or agency of a city in KRS

181.560

to

181.840

shall
also mean an urban-county government, mayor of an urban-county government,
legislative body of an urban-county government, or agency of an urban-county
government, respectively.

History.

Enact. Acts 2014, ch. 92, § 258, effective January 1, 2015.

181.570.
Bridge commission.

Any city may, by ordinance, create a bridge commission consisting of the chief executive of the city and four (4) persons appointed by such chief executive with the approval of the city legislative body. Each appointee shall be at least twenty-five (25) years of age.

The original appointments shall be made for terms of four (4) years, and their successors shall be appointed for one (1), two (2), three (3), and four (4) years respectively. Thereafter the appointments shall be for four-year terms. Not more than two (2) appointees shall be members of the same political party, and all members shall be eligible for reappointment. Vacancies shall be filled for the unexpired term in the same manner as original appointments.

No officer or employee of the city, whether he receives compensation or not, shall be appointed to the commission.

Each appointee shall take, subscribe and file the constitutional oath of office, and shall execute a bond, approved by the city legislative body, in the sum of five thousand dollars ($5000). The bond shall be filed with the other official bonds of the city.

History.

3235g-9; 2014, ch. 92, § 260, effective January 1, 2015.

181.580.
Commission is a corporation
— Officers — Compensation.

The commission shall constitute a corporation under the name of (insert name of city) Bridge Commission with the usual corporate powers.

The commission shall elect a chairman and a vice chairman from its members, and a secretary-treasurer who need not be a member of the commission.

The members of the commission, other than the chief executive, shall receive compensation fixed by the city legislative body, either as a salary or as payment for meetings attended, but the compensation of the chairman shall not exceed one thousand dollars ($1000) per annum and the compensation of each other member shall not exceed five hundred dollars ($500) per annum. The commission shall fix the compensation of the secretary-treasurer in its discretion.

All compensation of members and employees shall be paid solely from funds provided under the provisions of KRS

181.560

to

181.840

, and the commission shall not exercise any powers given it to bind the commission beyond the extent to which money is provided under KRS

181.560

to

181.840

.

History.

3235g-10.

181.590.
Powers of bridge commission.

The commission
may:

Establish bylaws, rules and regulations for its own government;

Make and enter into all contracts or agreements necessary or incidental to the performance of its duties and the execution of its powers; and

Employ engineers, attorneys, and other necessary employees, and fix their compensation.

History.

3235g-10.

181.600.
Restrictions on members
and employees.

No member, engineer, superintendent or foreman of the bridge commission shall:

Be employed by or hold any official or pecuniary relation to any person selling or furnishing material for the construction, improvement or maintenance of the bridge;

Be a candidate for or hold any public office other than that of commissioner; or

Be a member of any political committee.

No commissioner shall be an employee under the bridge commission.

If any commissioner, engineer, superintendent or foreman violates the provisions of paragraph (b) or (c) of subsection (1) of this section, his office or position shall be ipso facto vacated.

History.

3235g-11.

181.610.
Purchase of bridges.

The commission may purchase any toll bridge over a navigable stream so as to connect the city with an adjoining state, or any such toll bridge wholly or partly constructed, or any franchises, easements, permits or contracts for the construction of such bridges, upon terms and at prices considered by the bridge commission to be reasonable and that can be agreed upon between the commission and the owner.

Title shall be taken in the name of the city, subject to such mortgage or other lien as the seller reserves under the provisions of KRS

181.750

.

Upon the execution of any contract for the purchase of an existing bridge the seller shall be relieved from any obligation or duty theretofore imposed upon the owner by charter, legislative enactment, or otherwise to maintain and keep the bridge open to the public.

History.

3235g-12.

181.620.
Condemnation of property.

Whenever a reasonable price cannot be agreed upon, the commission may condemn any property necessary or convenient for the improvement or the efficient operation of any property acquired or constructed under KRS

181.560

to

181.840

, or for the purpose of constructing any bridge or portion of bridge, or for securing a right-of-way leading to the bridge or its approaches, in the manner provided in the Eminent Domain Act of Kentucky.

The commission may also exercise in Kentucky and adjoining states such powers of eminent domain as are conferred upon the city or commission by any Act of Congress.

Title to any property condemned by the commission shall be taken in the name of the city. The city shall be under no obligation to accept and pay for any property condemned, or any costs incidental to any condemnation proceedings, and shall in no event pay for property condemned or the cost of the proceedings except from the funds received under the provisions of KRS

181.560

to

181.840

.

The court having jurisdiction of the condemnation proceedings may make such orders as may be just to the city and to the owners of the property to be condemned, and may require a bond or other security to secure the owners against any loss or damage to be sustained by reason of the failure of the city to accept and pay for the property. The bond or security shall impose no liability upon the city, except such as may be paid from the funds received under KRS

181.560

to

181.840

.

History.

3235g-13: amend. Acts 1976, ch. 140, § 83.

181.630.
Improvements to be contracted
for before bonds are sold.

Before purchasing a bridge, the commission shall determine what repairs, additions or improvements will be necessary to place the bridge in safe and efficient condition for public use. The commission shall cause an estimate of the cost of the improvements to be made and submitted to it by an engineer appointed by the commission.

The commission shall contract for improvements before the sale of any bridge revenue bonds for the acquisition of the bridge.

History.

3235g-14.

181.640.
Purchase of real property — Contracts
to be advertised and awarded.

The commission may purchase within this and any adjoining state all real property and interest in real property necessary for the construction of the bridge, upon such terms and at such prices as it considers reasonable and that can be agreed upon between it and the owner. Title shall be taken in the name of the city.

No contract for the construction of the bridge exceeding the sum of twenty-five hundred dollars ($2500) shall be made without advertising for bids. The bids shall be opened publicly and an award made to the best bidder. The commission may reject any or all bids.

History.

3235g-15.

181.650.
Removal of obstructions
— Public ways and works to be restored.

All owners of physical obstructions in, over or upon the public streets or highways or in, under or over the stream over which a bridge is to be constructed, if such obstructions interfere with the construction or improvement of the bridge, shall, upon reasonable notice from the commission, promptly accommodate or remove the obstructions at their own expense, except as otherwise provided or required by law. The city legislative body may, by ordinance, prescribe the penalty for failure to comply with this subsection.

Any public ways or public works damaged or destroyed by reason of the building of the bridge or approaches shall be restored or repaired by the commission and placed in their original condition as nearly as practicable.

History.

3235g-16.

181.660.
Commission may issue bonds
— Form — Place of payment — Registration.

The commission may provide by resolution for the issuance of negotiable bonds to pay the cost of any such interstate bridge. The resolution shall recite an estimate of the cost. The bonds may be issued without a vote of the people.

The commission shall determine the form of the bonds, including interest coupons to be attached. The bonds shall be signed by the chairman of the commission and the chief executive of the city, under the city’s seal, attested by the city clerk or recorder, and the coupons shall bear the facsimile signature of the chairman.

The commission shall fix the denominations of the bonds and the places of payment of principal and interest, which may be at any bank or trust company in or out of the state.

The signatures of officers who cease to be officers before delivery of the bonds, shall be as valid as if they had remained in office until delivery.

Provision may be made for the registration of any of the bonds in the name of the principal alone.

History.

3235g-17.

Research References and Practice Aids

ALR

Power and discretion of officer or board authorized to issue bonds of governmental unit as regards terms or conditions to be included therein. 119 A.L.R. 190.

Power and discretion of officer or board authorized to issue bonds of governmental unit to include therein conditions as to place of payment. 119 A.L.R. 211.

181.670.
Interest on bonds —
Maturity — Redemption before maturity.

The bonds shall bear interest at a rate or rates or method of determining rates, payable at least annually, and shall mature not more than thirty (30) years from the date of their issuance, at a date fixed by the commission.

The bonds may be made redeemable before maturity, at the option of the commission, under terms fixed by the commission prior to the issuance of the bonds.

History.

3235g-17: 1996, ch. 274, § 41, effective July 15, 1996.

181.680.
Bonds to be paid from
bridge revenues only.

The principal and interest on the bonds shall be payable solely from the special fund provided for their payment.

The bonds shall contain a statement on their face that the city shall not be obligated to pay the principal or interest thereon except from the revenues of the bridge.

History.

3235g-17.

181.690.
Sale of bonds —
Use of proceeds and manner of withdrawal.

The commission may sell the bonds at private sale without advertisement or in any other manner and for such price as it considers for the best interest of the city, taking into consideration the financial responsibility of the purchaser, the terms and conditions of the purchase, and the availability of the proceeds of the bonds when required for payment of the cost of the bridge.

The proceeds of the sale of the bonds shall be used solely for the payment of the cost of the bridge, and shall be checked out by the chairman or vice chairman, and the secretary-treasurer of the commission under such restrictions as the commission provides.

History.

3235g-17.

181.700.
Bonds to be lawful investments
— Tax-exempt.

The bonds shall be lawful investments of banks, trust companies, trustees, and of commissioners of the sinking fund of municipalities and counties, and shall be acceptable as security for the deposit of public money.

The bonds and the income thereof shall be exempt from taxation.

History.

3235g-17.

181.710.
Additional bonds may be
issued — Effect of surplus.

If the proceeds of the bonds are less than the cost of the bridge, additional bonds may be issued in the same manner to provide the amount of the deficit, and unless otherwise provided in the trust indenture, shall be deemed to be of the same issue and shall be entitled to payment from the same fund without preference or priority of the bonds first issued for the same bridge.

If the proceeds of the bonds exceed the cost of the bridge, the surplus shall be paid into the fund for the payment of principal and interest of the bonds.

History.

3235g-17.

181.720.
Temporary bonds.

Prior to the
preparation of the bonds provided for in KRS

181.660

,
the commission may issue temporary bonds with or without coupons.
The temporary bonds shall be issued under the restrictions set out
in KRS

181.660

to

181.710

, and
shall be exchangeable for the bonds issued under KRS 181.660.

History.

3235g-17.

181.730.
Application of, and lien
on, proceeds of bonds.

All money received
from the sale of bonds issued under KRS

181.660

to

181.720

shall
be applied solely to the payment of the cost of the bridge or to the
appurtenant sinking fund, and the holders of the bonds or the trustee,
as provided in KRS

181.740

,
shall have a lien upon such money until it is so applied.

History.

3235g-18.

181.740.
Trustee may be selected
— Provisions of trust indenture — Expenses of indenture.

The commission may secure any issue of bonds by a trust indenture between the city and a corporate trustee, which may be any trust company or bank having the powers of a trust company within or outside of the state, or such corporate trustee and an individual as cotrustee.

The trust indenture may contain provisions for protecting and enforcing the rights and remedies of the bondholders, including covenants setting forth the duties of the commission in relation to the acquisition, construction, improvement, maintenance, operation and insurance of the bridge, and the custody, safeguarding and application of all money.

The trust indenture may also provide that the bridge shall be acquired, constructed, or partly acquired and partly constructed, and paid for under the supervision and approval of consulting engineers or other persons employed or designated by the commission and satisfactory to the bondholders, who may be given the right to require that the security given by contractors and by any depository of the proceeds of the bonds or revenues of the bridge or other money pertaining thereto be satisfactory to them.

The indenture may set forth the rights and remedies of the bondholders and trustee, restricting the individual right of action of bondholders as is customary in trust indentures securing bonds and debentures of corporations.

The commission may provide by resolution or by trust indenture for the payment of the proceeds of the sale of the bonds and revenues of the bridge to such officer, board or depository as it may determine for the custody thereof, and may provide the method of disbursement thereof, with such safeguards and restrictions as it finds best.

All expenses incurred in carrying out the trust indenture may be treated as a part of the cost of maintenance and operation of the bridge affected by the indenture.

History.

3235g-19.

181.750.
Trust indenture may create
a lien on the bridge property, when.

No trust indenture
shall convey or mortgage the bridge unless the trust indenture is
entered into for the purpose of securing bonds issued to acquire a
bridge by purchase, in which event the trust indenture may create
a lien by way of deed of trust or mortgage upon the bridge, and may
contain reasonable provisions for the enforcement of the lien, including,
but without limiting the same by the particular statement thereof,
and provisions for the taking of possession and the sale by the trustee
of the bridge, together with the franchises for the operation thereof,
in the event of failure to pay the principal and interest of the bonds
or any part thereof at the time appointed for the payment thereof,
or in the event of any other default under the terms of the indenture.

History.

3235g-19.

181.760.
Commission to fix and
collect bridge tolls.

The commission
shall fix and collect tolls for transit over each bridge. The tolls
shall be adjusted, in respect of the aggregate of tolls from each
bridge for which bonds are issued, so as to provide a fund sufficient
to pay the principal and interest on the bonds, and to provide an
additional fund to pay the cost of maintaining, repairing and operating
the bridge, subject, however, to any applicable law or regulation
of the United States.

History.

3235g-20.

181.770.
Allocation of fund for
payment of principal and interest.

The fund for payment of principal and interest on the bonds shall be set aside each month in a sinking fund for the payment of:

The interest upon such bonds as it falls due;

The necessary fiscal agency charges for paying bonds and interest; and

The payment of the principal of the bonds, such sinking fund to be a fund for all such bonds without distinction or priority of one over another.

Prior to the issuance of the bonds the commission may provide by resolution or by trust indenture for using the sinking fund or any part thereof in the purchase of any of the outstanding bonds payable therefrom at the market price, but not exceeding the price at which the bonds shall at the next interest date be payable or redeemable, and all bonds redeemed or purchased shall be canceled and shall not again be issued.

The money in the sinking fund, if not used within a reasonable time for the purchase of bonds for cancellation, shall be applied to the redemption of bonds by lot at the redemption price then applicable.

History.

3235g-20.

181.780.
Tolls to cease when bonds
are paid — Exception.

When the principal
and interest on the particular bonds issued for a bridge have been
paid or a sufficient amount have been provided and is being held for
their payment, the commission shall cease to charge tolls for the
use of the bridge and thereafter such bridge shall be free unless
tolls shall be required for maintaining, repairing and operating the
bridge.

History.

3235g-21.

181.790.
Trustee and bondholders
may bring actions to protect rights.

Any holder of
the bonds or coupons attached thereto, and the trustee, unless the
rights given by this section are restricted by resolution passed before
the issuance of the bonds or by the trust indenture, may bring an
action, either at law or in equity, to protect and enforce any right
granted under KRS

181.560

to

181.840

or under
such resolution or trust indenture and may enforce performance of
all duties required by KRS

181.560

to

181.840

, or by
such resolution or trust indenture to be performed by the city issuing
the bonds, or by the commission or any officer thereof, including
the fixing, charging and collecting of tolls for transit over the
bridge.

History.

3235g-22.

181.800.
Commission may accept
contributions.

The commission may receive contributions of either money or property or other things of value, to be held and applied for the purposes of KRS

181.560

to

181.840

.

The commission may enter into agreements with any adjoining state or any subdivision thereof, whereby such adjoining state or subdivision may contribute either money or property to the cost of the construction, acquisition or the operation and maintenance of any bridge connecting the city with the adjoining state.

History.

3235g-23.

181.810.
Competing
bridges and ferries must have permit. [Repealed.]

181.820.
Acquisition of ferries.

The commission
of any city authorizing bridge revenue bonds under KRS

181.660

or

181.720

, may
purchase all ferries, together with necessary lands and appurtenances
thereto, which are operating across the stream to be spanned by the
bridge to be acquired or constructed and which are within five (5)
miles of the location of such bridge. The purchase price of such ferries
shall be deemed a part of the cost of the bridge and shall be paid
solely from funds received under the provisions of KRS

181.560

to

181.840

. The
commission may maintain and operate any ferry so purchased and fix
such rates of toll for the use thereof as it deems proper, or it may
in its discretion sell or otherwise dispose of any ferry so purchased,
or it may abandon or dismantle the ferries when it seems expedient
to do so. All tolls collected for the use of the ferries and the proceeds
of any sale or disposition of any ferries shall be used to pay the
cost of maintaining, repairing and operating the ferries, and any
residue shall be paid into the sinking fund provided for the bonds.

History.

3235g-25.

181.830.
Additional powers of commission.

In addition to
the powers and duties and subject to the limitations enumerated in KRS

181.560

to

181.840

, the
commission may do all things necessary or convenient in the construction
or acquisition, maintenance and operation of any bridge to be constructed
or acquired under the provisions of KRS

181.560

to

181.840

, and
in the financing thereof, in order that the bridge may be operated
free of tolls as early as possible and practicable.

History.

3235g-26.

181.840.
Dissolution of commission
— City legislative body to operate and maintain bridge.

When the principal
and interest on all of the bonds have been paid or their payment fully
provided for, the commission shall stand dissolved. Thereupon the
city legislative body shall assume the operation and maintenance of
the bridge, and, unless the cost of operation, maintenance and repair
is otherwise provided for, shall assume the collection of tolls for
the payment of the cost, and shall do all other acts necessary and
convenient for the maintenance of the bridge.

History.

3235g-27.